Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.150

Notice of charges.

(1) The director may issue and serve a notice of charges upon:

(a) A state trust institution;

(b) An affiliate of a state trust institution;

(c) A director, officer, manager, employee, or agent of a state trust institution or its affiliate; or

(d) Any other person subject to the jurisdiction of the department under this title including, without limitation, a person engaged in unauthorized trust activity.

(2) Such notice of charges may be issued to and served upon any person or entity described in subsection (1) of this section whenever such person or entity:

(a) Has engaged in an unsafe or unsound practice;

(b) Has violated any provision of RCW 30B.10.050; or

(c) Is planning, attempting, or currently conducting any act prohibited in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(3) The notice shall contain a statement of the facts constituting the acts or omissions specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The notice shall set a time and place at which a hearing will be held to determine whether the following remedies should be granted:

(a) An order to cease and desist any of the acts or omissions specified in subsection (2) of this section;

(b) An order compelling affirmative action to redress any of the acts or omissions specified in subsection (2) of this section;

(c) An order imposing fines as authorized by RCW 30B.10.070;

(d) Restitution to beneficiaries, trustors, or other aggrieved persons;

(e) Costs and expenses related to investigation and enforcement, including attorney fees; and

(f) Other remedies authorized by law.

[ 2019 c 389 s 21.]